Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
GAME MAMMALS

§183D-51 Game mammals defined; exception.
(a) For the purposes of enforcing the wildlife laws of the State the following
named mammals are hereby designated as game mammals when living in a wild or
feral state not under domestication: deer (family Cervidae), pronghorn (family
Antilocapridae), goat (Capra hircus), sheep (Ovis aries), cattle (Bos taurus),
pig (Sus scrofa), and any other mammal that may be or has been introduced into
the State and released for hunting and for which a hunting season is
established by law or by rule of the department.

(b) Nothing in this section shall permit the
taking, catching, pursuing, or killing of any mammal in the legal possession or
control of any person, or where otherwise prohibited by law or by rule of the
department. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next